Maryland, session 2026, SB0597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–1402.
(a) There is a Cyber Warrior Diversity Program at:
(1) Baltimore City Community College;
(2) Bowie State University;
(3) Coppin State University;
(4) Morgan State University;
(5) The University of Maryland Eastern Shore; and
(6) The University of Maryland Baltimore County Training Centers that
are located in the State.

SENATE BILL 597
(b) The purpose of each Program is to train students in computer networking
[and], cybersecurity, AND ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(c) The governing entity at each institution is responsible for administering the
Program at that institution.
(d) On or before July 1 each year, beginning in 2024, the Commission, in
consultation with the Cybersecurity Association of Maryland, Inc., shall, if applicable,
expand the Program to accommodate any changes in certification trends identified under §
10–496 of the Economic Development Article.
12–124.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “HUB” MEANS A MARYLAND TECHNOLOGY EXTENSION HUB.
(3) “PARTNERSHIP” MEANS THE MARYLAND ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE PARTNERSHIP.
(4) “PLAN” MEANS THE MARYLAND STATE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE STRATEGIC PLAN.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
PARTNERSHIP IN THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PARTNERSHIP IS TO PROVIDE A SINGLE
NEXUS FOR STAKEHOLDERS IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INITIATIVES TO ADVANCE
THE INNOVATION, ECONOMIC GROWTH, WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT, AND PUBLIC
GOOD ACROSS THE STATE.
(3) THE PARTNERSHIP SHALL:
(I) CONNECT, ACCELERATE, AND SCALE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE INITIATIVES;
(II) ENSURE ALIGNMENT OF THE STATE’S ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE EFFORTS TO PREVENT FRAGMENTATION;
(III) LEVERAGE RESOURCES TO INCREASE THE STATE’S
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE–TRAINED WORKFORCE AND TO INTEGRATE THE USE OF
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN STATE GOVERNMENT;

SENATE BILL 597 5
(IV) (III) IDENTIFY AND PURSUE FUNDING OPPORTUNITIES
ACROSS ALL RESOURCES, INCLUDING FEDERAL, STATE, INDUSTRY, AND
PHILANTHROPIC ENTITIES; AND
(V) (IV) ESTABLISH MARYLAND TECHNOLOGY EXTENSION
HUBS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) IN CARRYING OUT THE POWERS AND DUTIES GRANTED UNDER
THIS SECTION, THE PARTNERSHIP SHALL WORK IN CONSULTATION AND
COLLABORATION CONSULT WITH:
(I) STATE AGENCIES;
(II) INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE;
(III) THE MARYLAND SMALL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
CENTER; AND
(IV) THE LOCAL WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARDS.
(5) THERE IS A DIRECTOR IN THE PARTNERSHIP.
(C) (1) (I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE PARTNERSHIP
SHALL DEVELOP A STRATEGIC PLAN.
(II) THE PLAN SHALL INCLUDE METRICS:
1. METRICS FOR THE GOALS OF INCREASING THE CORE
AREAS OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE LITERACY, WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT,
BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT, AND RESEARCH AND INNOVATION;
2. A BUSINESS PLAN AND TIMELINE FOR THE
DEVELOPMENT OF HUBS, INCLUDING NECESSARY FUNDING AND PARTNERSHIPS,
AND HOW TO PROVIDE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SKILLS TRAINING TO
INDIVIDUALS AT LITTLE OR NO COST;
3. A BUSINESS PLAN AND TIMELINE FOR THE
DEVELOPMENT OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INCUBATION LAB UNDER §
12–126 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO BE ESTABLISHED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
GOVERNOR’S ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SUBCABINET ESTABLISHED UNDER §
3.5–806 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 597
4. AN ANALYSIS OF SCHOLARSHIP AND FELLOWSHIP
NEEDS AND OPPORTUNITIES TO EXPAND ACCESS AND WORKFORCE EXPERIENCE
OPPORTUNITIES IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE; AND
5. A BUSINESS PLAN AND MODEL FOR THE
PARTNERSHIP TO ENSURE SUSTAINED IMPACT.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE PARTNERSHIP SHALL SUBMIT A PROGRESS REPORT ON
ACHIEVING THE PLAN.
(3) THE PARTNERSHIP SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORTS REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO:
(I) THE GOVERNOR; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(D) (1) (I) THE PARTNERSHIP SHALL, IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, ESTABLISH MARYLAND TECHNOLOGY
EXTENSION HUBS IN STRATEGIC LOCATIONS.
(II) TO THE EXTENT CONSISTENT AND PRACTICABLE WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR’S STRATEGIC PRIORITIES AND RESOURCES,
THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR MAY COLLABORATE WITH THE
PARTNERSHIP ON ESTABLISHING THE HUBS.
(II) (III) THE HUBS SHALL PRIORITIZE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE BUT MAY BROADEN TO ADDITIONAL SECTORS AS APPROPRIATE.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 15, 2026 2027, THERE SHALL BE ONE
HUB IN EACH OF THREE REGIONS OF THE STATE ESTABLISHED ON A PILOT BASIS.
(3) EACH HUB SHALL:
(I) ACT AS A SINGLE POINT OF CONTACT TO CONNECT SMALL
BUSINESSES WITH CRITICAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE RESOURCES;
(II) PARTNER WITH ORGANIZATIONS, INCLUDING A
COMMUNITY COLLEGE, LOCAL EMPLOYERS, SMALL BUSINESS ASSOCIATIONS, AND
COMMUNITY ORGANIZERS; AND

SENATE BILL 597 7
(III) FACILITATE REMOTE, CLOUD–BASED ACCESS TO CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING LEVERAGING THE SIGNIFICANT COMPUTING POWER
OF COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES; AND
(IV) PROVIDE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SKILLS TRAINING TO
INDIVIDUALS AT NO CHARGE, INCLUDING THROUGH COURSES AND
CREDIT–BEARING CREDENTIALS.
12–125.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FELLOWSHIP” MEANS THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE PUBLIC SERVICE FELLOWSHIP.
(B) THERE IS AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PUBLIC SERVICE
FELLOWSHIP IN THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND THAT IS IN ALIGNMENT
WITH THE MARYLAND STATE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE STRATEGIC PLAN UNDER
§ 12–124 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FELLOWSHIP IS TO MATCH STUDENTS ENROLLED
IN PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION WITH STATE AGENCIES TO
ADDRESS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PROJECTS.
(D) THE FELLOWSHIP MAY INCLUDE A MECHANISM BY WHICH A STATE
AGENCY, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT, MAY REPURPOSE FUNDS TO SUPPORT THE FELLOWSHIP.
(E) THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND SHALL CONSULT WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT AND THE GOVERNOR’S ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SUBCABINET ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3.5–806 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
12–126.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LAB” MEANS THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
INCUBATION LAB.
(B) (1) THERE SUBJECT TO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING
BETWEEN THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, THERE IS AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INCUBATION
LAB IN THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE LAB IS TO ASSIST STATE AGENCIES TO
ACCELERATE THE RESPONSIBLE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE BY HELPING

SENATE BILL 597
STATE AGENCIES TO DISCOVER, DEVELOP, AND APPLY PROTOTYPES AND MANAGE
RISK OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOLUTIONS.
(3) IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY, THE LAB SHALL:
(I) SUPPORT STATE AGENCIES TO:
1. IDENTIFY AREAS OF OPPORTUNITY TO APPLY
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOLUTIONS AND PRIORITIZE CHALLENGES FOR
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND RELATED EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES;
2. SUPPORT THE DISCOVERY AND DEVELOPMENT OF
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE APPLICATIONS, AGENTIC SYSTEMS, AND INTERFACES;
AND
3. DEVELOP PROTOTYPES AND PROOFS OF CONCEPTS
FOR MODERNIZATION EFFORTS;
(II) MATCH STATE AGENCIES WITH UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF
MARYLAND FACULTY, RESEARCHERS, AND STUDENTS WITH EXPERTISE; AND
(III) SUPPORT THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY’S ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PROGRAM TO PROVIDE A PROVING
GROUND FOR EXPERIMENTATION OF HOW TO APPLY ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
TECHNOLOGY WITHIN STATE AGENCIES.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SHALL
PROVIDE POLICY GUIDANCE AND SUPPORT FOR INTEGRATING THE WORK OF THE
LAB INTO STATE AGENCIES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MAY
PROVIDE FUNDS TO SUPPORT THE ACTIVITIES OF THE LAB.
(C) THE LAB MAY CONSULT WITH THE GOVERNOR’S ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SUBCABINET ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3.5–806 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SHALL PROVIDE
POLICY GUIDANCE TO THE LAB AND MAY SUPPORT FOR INTEGRATING THE
INTEGRATION OF THE WORK OF THE LAB INTO STATE AGENCIES, TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE.

SENATE BILL 597 9
14–101.
(c) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Board of Regents” means the Board of Regents of Morgan State
University.
(3) “University” means Morgan State University.
14–111.
(A) THE CENTER FOR EQUITABLE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND
MACHINE LEARNING SYSTEMS AT THE UNIVERSITY SHALL SERVE AS A STATEWIDE
RESOURCE AND COORDINATING HUB TO SUPPORT STATE AGENCIES ON THE
PRODUCTIVE, SECURE, AND ETHICAL USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN THE
STATE.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE GOVERNOR’S
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SUBCABINET ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3.5–806 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE MAY REQUEST THAT THE CENTER
FOR EQUITABLE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND MACHINE LEARNING SYSTEMS
COMPLETE A RESEARCH REQUEST THAT THE CENTER SHALL COORDINATE AND
LEAD, COLLABORATING WITH OTHERS AS NEEDED.
(2) THE CENTER FOR EQUITABLE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND
MACHINE LEARNING SYSTEMS SHALL:
(I) COORDINATE AND LEAD THE RESEARCH;
(II) COLLABORATE WITH OTHER ENTITIES AS NEEDED;
(III) SUMMARIZE THE RESEARCH CONDUCTED; AND
(IV) SUMMARIZE ANY CONCLUSIONS OR RECOMMENDATIONS
RESULTING FROM THE RESEARCH.
(3) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 OF THE YEAR FOLLOWING THE
RESEARCH REQUEST, THE CENTER FOR EQUITABLE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
AND MACHINE LEARNING SYSTEMS SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT THAT CONTAINS THE
INFORMATION LISTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO:
(I) THE GOVERNOR’S ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SUBCABINET ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3.5–806 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 597
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON CYBERSECURITY,
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, AND BIOTECHNOLOGY ESTABLISHED UNDER §
2–10A–13 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
18–3501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Program” means the [Cybersecurity] EMERGING TECHNOLOGY Public
Service Scholarship Program.
18–3502.
(a) There is a scholarship program known as the [Cybersecurity] EMERGING
TECHNOLOGY Public Service Scholarship Program in the State.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to support students who are pursuing an
education in programs that [are] PROVIDE CORE SKILLS directly relevant to cybersecurity
OR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
18–3503.
(b) An individual may apply to the Office for a scholarship under this subtitle if
the individual:
(1) Is eligible for in–State tuition;
(2) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, is a student who:
(i) Is enrolled full–time at an eligible institution in an approved
degree or certificate program that is directly relevant to cybersecurity OR ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE; and
(ii) Is within 3 years of graduation from the individual’s degree or
certificate program;
(f) (2) Each recipient of a scholarship under this subtitle may hold the award
for 6 years if the recipient:
(i) Is a part–time student;
(ii) Continues to be eligible for in–State tuition under this article;
and

SENATE BILL 597 11
(iii) Continues to be a student at the institution and takes at least 6
semester hours of courses each semester leading to a degree or certificate that is directly
relevant to cybersecurity OR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(g) The Department shall provide information on the Program to high school
students who participate in career and technology education programs related to
cybersecurity OR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
18–3504.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, for 1 year for
each year that the recipient receives a scholarship under this subtitle, a scholarship
recipient shall:
(i) Work in the State in the cybersecurity OR ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE field for a:
1. A. Local education agency;
B. Public high school; or
C. Community college; or
2. Unit of:
A. State government;
B. County government; or
C. City or municipal government; or
(ii) Teach in the State in an education program that is directly
relevant to cybersecurity OR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE in:
1. A public high school; or
2. A community college.
(b) In accordance with § 18–112 of this title, a scholarship recipient shall repay
the Commission the funds received under this subtitle if the recipient does not:
(2) Complete an approved degree or certificate program that is directly
relevant to cybersecurity OR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE at an eligible institution; and
Article – State Finance and Procurement

SENATE BILL 597
3.5–806.
(a) There is a Governor’s Artificial Intelligence Subcabinet of the Governor’s
Executive Council.
(b) The purpose of the Subcabinet is to facilitate and enhance cooperation among
units of State government, in consultation with academic institutions and industries
utilizing artificial intelligence.
(F) THE SUBCABINET MAY REQUEST RESEARCH TO BE COMPLETED UNDER
§ 14–111 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
[(f)] (G) The Governor shall provide the Subcabinet with sufficient resources to
perform the functions of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.